tools/spellcheckers/editdist-est.regex
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
[
[
# insertion
"" -> [[a "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 | [c "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [f "<CORR>"]::30 | [g "<CORR>"]::30 | [h "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [j "<CORR>"]::30 | [k "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 | [m "<CORR>"]::30 | [n "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [p "<CORR>"]::30 | [r "<CORR>"]::30 | [s "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 | [v "<CORR>"]::30] , 
# same, deletion or substitution (keyboard, shape, sound)
a -> [ a | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [s "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
b -> [ b | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [n "<CORR>"]::30 | [v "<CORR>"]::30 | [p "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
c -> [ c | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [v "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
d -> [ d | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [s "<CORR>"]::30 | [f "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
e -> [ e | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [w "<CORR>"]::30 | [r "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [a "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
f -> [ f | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [g "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
g -> [ g | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [h "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 | [k "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
h -> [ h | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [g "<CORR>"]::30 | [j "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
i -> [ i | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [j "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
j -> [ j | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [k "<CORR>"]::30 | [h "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
k -> [ k | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [j "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 | [g "<CORR>"]::30 | [h "<CORR>"]::30 | [n "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
l -> [ l | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [k "<CORR>"]::30 | [ö "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
m -> [ m | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [n "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
n -> [ n | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [m "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
o -> [ o | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [a "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 | [p "<CORR>"]::30 | [õ "<CORR>"]::30 | [ö "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
p -> [ p | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [ü "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
r -> [ r | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
s -> [ s | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [a "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [š "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
z -> [ z | [ž "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
t -> [ t | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [r "<CORR>"]::30 | [d "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
u -> [ u | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [i "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 | [o "<CORR>"]::30 | [a "<CORR>"]::30 | [ü "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
v -> [ v | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [b "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
w -> [ w | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [e "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
õ -> [ õ | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [ü "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
ä -> [ ä | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [ö "<CORR>"]::30 | [õ "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
ö -> [ ö | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [l "<CORR>"]::30 | [ä "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
ü -> [ ü | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [p "<CORR>"]::30 | [õ "<CORR>"]::30 | [ä "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
y -> [ y | ["" "<CORR>"]::30 | [t "<CORR>"]::30 | [u "<CORR>"]::30 ] ,
"" -> ""
]
]
# transposition 12 -> 21
|
[?* [
[a:0 ? 0:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:0 ? 0:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[c:0 ? 0:c 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:0 ? 0:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:0 ? 0:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:0 ? 0:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:0 ? 0:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:0 ? 0:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:0 ? 0:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:0 ? 0:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:0 ? 0:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:0 ? 0:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[m:0 ? 0:m 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[n:0 ? 0:n 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[o:0 ? 0:o 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[p:0 ? 0:p 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[q:0 ? 0:q 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[r:0 ? 0:r 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[s:0 ? 0:s 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[š:0 ? 0:š 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[z:0 ? 0:z 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ž:0 ? 0:ž 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[t:0 ? 0:t 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[u:0 ? 0:u 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[v:0 ? 0:v 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[w:0 ? 0:w 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[õ:0 ? 0:õ 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ä:0 ? 0:ä 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ö:0 ? 0:ö 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ü:0 ? 0:ü 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[x:0 ? 0:x 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[y:0 ? 0:y 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
# transposition 123 -> 231
[a:0 ? ? 0:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:0 ? ? 0:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[c:0 ? ? 0:c 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:0 ? ? 0:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:0 ? ? 0:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:0 ? ? 0:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:0 ? ? 0:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:0 ? ? 0:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:0 ? ? 0:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:0 ? ? 0:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:0 ? ? 0:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:0 ? ? 0:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[m:0 ? ? 0:m 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[n:0 ? ? 0:n 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[o:0 ? ? 0:o 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[p:0 ? ? 0:p 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[q:0 ? ? 0:q 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[r:0 ? ? 0:r 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[s:0 ? ? 0:s 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[š:0 ? ? 0:š 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[z:0 ? ? 0:z 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ž:0 ? ? 0:ž 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[t:0 ? ? 0:t 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[u:0 ? ? 0:u 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[v:0 ? ? 0:v 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[w:0 ? ? 0:w 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[õ:0 ? ? 0:õ 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ä:0 ? ? 0:ä 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ö:0 ? ? 0:ö 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[ü:0 ? ? 0:ü 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[x:0 ? ? 0:x 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[y:0 ? ? 0:y 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
# transposition 123 -> 312
[0:a ? ? a:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:b ? ? b:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:c ? ? c:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:d ? ? d:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:e ? ? e:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:f ? ? f:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:g ? ? g:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:h ? ? h:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:i ? ? i:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:j ? ? j:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:k ? ? k:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:l ? ? l:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:m ? ? m:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:n ? ? n:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:o ? ? o:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:p ? ? p:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:q ? ? q:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:r ? ? r:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:s ? ? s:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:š ? ? š:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:z ? ? z:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:ž ? ? ž:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:t ? ? t:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:u ? ? u:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:v ? ? v:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:w ? ? w:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:õ ? ? õ:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:ä ? ? ä:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:ö ? ? ö:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:ü ? ? ü:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:x ? ? x:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[0:y ? ? y:0 0:"<CORR>"]::15 
]?* ]
# transposition 123 -> 321
|
[?* [
[a:b ? b:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:d ? d:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:e ? e:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:f ? f:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:g ? g:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:h ? h:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:i ? i:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:j ? j:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:k ? k:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:l ? l:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:m ? m:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:n ? n:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:o ? o:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:p ? p:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:r ? r:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:s ? s:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:t ? t:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:u ? u:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[a:v ? v:a 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:a ? a:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:d ? d:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:e ? e:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:f ? f:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:g ? g:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:h ? h:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:i ? i:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:j ? j:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:k ? k:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:l ? l:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:m ? m:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:n ? n:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:o ? o:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:p ? p:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:r ? r:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:s ? s:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:t ? t:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:u ? u:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[b:v ? v:b 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:a ? a:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:b ? b:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:e ? e:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:f ? f:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:g ? g:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:h ? h:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:i ? i:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:j ? j:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:k ? k:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:l ? l:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:m ? m:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:n ? n:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:o ? o:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:p ? p:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:r ? r:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:s ? s:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:t ? t:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:u ? u:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[d:v ? v:d 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:a ? a:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:b ? b:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:d ? d:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:f ? f:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:g ? g:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:h ? h:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:i ? i:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:j ? j:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:k ? k:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:l ? l:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:m ? m:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:n ? n:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:o ? o:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:p ? p:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:r ? r:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:s ? s:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:t ? t:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:u ? u:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[e:v ? v:e 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:a ? a:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:b ? b:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:d ? d:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:e ? e:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:g ? g:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:h ? h:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:i ? i:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:j ? j:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:k ? k:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:l ? l:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:m ? m:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:n ? n:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:o ? o:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:p ? p:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:r ? r:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:s ? s:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:t ? t:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:u ? u:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[f:v ? v:f 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:a ? a:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:b ? b:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:d ? d:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:e ? e:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:f ? f:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:h ? h:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:i ? i:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:j ? j:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:k ? k:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:l ? l:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:m ? m:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:n ? n:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:o ? o:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:p ? p:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:r ? r:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:s ? s:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:t ? t:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:u ? u:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[g:v ? v:g 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:a ? a:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:b ? b:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:d ? d:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:e ? e:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:f ? f:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:g ? g:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:i ? i:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:j ? j:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:k ? k:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:l ? l:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:m ? m:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:n ? n:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:o ? o:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:p ? p:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:r ? r:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:s ? s:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:t ? t:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:u ? u:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[h:v ? v:h 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:a ? a:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:b ? b:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:d ? d:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:e ? e:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:f ? f:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:g ? g:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:h ? h:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:j ? j:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:k ? k:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:l ? l:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:m ? m:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:n ? n:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:o ? o:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:p ? p:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:r ? r:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:s ? s:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:t ? t:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:u ? u:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[i:v ? v:i 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:a ? a:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:b ? b:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:d ? d:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:e ? e:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:f ? f:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:g ? g:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:h ? h:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:i ? i:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:k ? k:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:l ? l:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:m ? m:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:n ? n:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:o ? o:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:p ? p:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:r ? r:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:s ? s:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:t ? t:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:u ? u:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[j:v ? v:j 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:a ? a:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:b ? b:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:d ? d:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:e ? e:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:f ? f:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:g ? g:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:h ? h:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:i ? i:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:j ? j:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:l ? l:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:m ? m:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:n ? n:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:o ? o:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:p ? p:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:r ? r:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:s ? s:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:t ? t:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:u ? u:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[k:v ? v:k 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:a ? a:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:b ? b:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:d ? d:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:e ? e:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:f ? f:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:g ? g:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:h ? h:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:i ? i:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:j ? j:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:k ? k:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:m ? m:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:n ? n:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:o ? o:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
[l:p ? p:l 0:"<CORR>"]::15 |
